District of Columbia statutes.
29-401.21

Proceedings prior to corporate action.

(a)

If, under applicable law or the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a nonprofit corporation, there has been a failure to hold a meeting to take corporate action and the failure has continued for 30 days after the date designated or appropriate therefor, the Superior Court may summarily order a meeting to be held upon the application of any person entitled, either alone or in conjunction with other persons similarly seeking relief under this section, to call a meeting to consider the corporate action in issue, or the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the case of a charitable corporation.

(b)

The Superior Court may determine the right to vote at the meeting of persons claiming that right, may appoint an individual to hold the meeting under such orders and powers as the Superior Court may consider proper, and may take such action as may be required to give due notice of the meeting and convene and conduct the meeting in the interests of justice.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-401.22.